Maine, session 132, LD433.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2303, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
D. Is Except to the extent of an applicable federal waiver, is qualified as a driver under
the motor carrier safety regulations of the United States Department of Transportation,
Federal Highway Administration, if that person or that person's employer is subject to
those regulations;
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2303, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
E. Passes an examination of the person's ability to operate the specific vehicle that will
be driven as a school bus or a vehicle of comparable type. For purposes of this
paragraph, a vehicle of comparable type does not include a combination vehicle
consisting of a truck tractor and semitrailer;
Sec. 3. Secretary of State to seek waivers. The Secretary of State shall seek from
the United States Department of Transportation, Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration under 49 United States Code, Section 31315 a waiver of the engine
compartment component of the pre-trip vehicle inspection skills testing requirement in 49
Code of Federal Regulations, Section 383.113(a)(1)(i), known as "the under-the-hood"
component, for commercial driver's license applicants seeking the school bus and
passenger endorsements, as well as a waiver of the requirement in 49 Code of Federal
Regulations, Section 383.133(c)(1) that the State administer this portion of the pre-trip
vehicle inspection skills test in accordance with a Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration pre-approved examiner manual. The Secretary of State may seek additional
waivers of requirements that the Secretary of State determines are unnecessary for
operation of a school bus in this State. As long as those requirements continue to apply to
school bus operators in this State, the Secretary of State shall seek renewals of waivers
received. The Secretary of State shall report to the Joint Standing Committee on
Transportation by December 3, 2025 on the progress in obtaining the waivers, as well as
any related changes in federal law or regulations that may be pending or have taken place.